Hawaii, session 2026, SB1581.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that 2025 marks the eightieth anniversary of the end of World War II, which impacted the people of Hawaii and Japan greatly.  However, the legislature also finds that through eight decades of determined effort, the people of Hawaii and Japan have committed themselves to spreading peace throughout the Pacific and have built a lasting friendship demonstrating to future generations that peace is always possible. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Establish the Hawaii-Japan Pacific peace monument as a historical and cultural landmark to recognize and commemorate the journey towards friendship and peace between the people of Hawaii and Japan, and the bright future of endless potential of Hawaii and Japan; and (2)  Appropriate funds for the planning, design, and construction of the Hawaii-Japan peace monument. SECTION 2. Chapter 6E, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§6E-     Hawaii-Japan Pacific peace monument.  (a) There is established a Hawaii-Japan Pacific peace monument as a historical site on Oahu to recognize and commemorate the journey towards friendship and peace between the people of Hawaii and Japan and the bright future of endless potential of Hawaii and Japan. (b)  The monument shall be developed jointly by the state foundation on culture and the arts and appropriate stakeholders representing Hawaii and Japan, and shall be situated on or consist of lands within or adjacent to the East-West center that are determined to be appropriate.  The monument shall be used to provide the public with educational opportunities or resources and access to spaces for reflection, recreation, and enjoyment of the monument." SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the works of art special fund the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the planning, design, and construction of the Hawaii-Japan Pacific peace monument. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the state foundation on culture and the arts for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.